Massachusetts, session 194th, H2959.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 4B of chapter 4 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by inserting after the word ”under”, in line 14, the following words: - “chapter
31,”
of 1